Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 604.027 is amended to read:
604.027. (1) A person desiring to  record a brand on any species of livestock shall submit a
written and signed application therefor to the  State Department of Agriculture, setting forth a fac-
simile and description of the brand, the  species of livestock upon which it will be used and the
specific  intended  location on the animal. The application must be accompanied by a brand
[recording] conflict research  fee of $25 for each brand  on each species of livestock on which the
brand is to be used. The person must also pay an activation fee matching  the cycle set for the ap-
proved brand  under subsection (4) of this section prior to recordation of the brand. The activation
fee may not exceed [ $100] $200. Upon receipt of an application and the required fees, if the depart-
ment determines that the brand applied for is available, the department shall issue a certificate of
recordation of the distinctive brand, the approved location on  the animal and the species of live-
stock to which it applies.
(2) During September of each year the department shall attempt to notify all holders of an ex-
piring recorded brand of the need to renew the brand. The department shall  attempt the notification
by sending a renewal notice to the holder’s last address as shown  on the department’s records. The
holder of a recorded brand may renew the brand  by submitting to the department a brand renewal
fee for each brand on each species of livestock on which the brand is  to be used. The brand renewal
fee may not exceed [ $100] $200. However, if the species of livestock  is sheep, the fee may not exceed
$50.
(3) A recorded brand expires if  the department does not receive the brand renewal fee by Jan-
uary 4 next following the attempt to notify the brand  holder of the need to renew the brand. Within
60 days after a brand expires, the department shall give written  notice of the expiration by mail
addressed to the person who held the expired brand at  the last address shown on the department’s
records. The fee to activate an expired brand is equal to the brand [ recording] conflict research
fee plus a renewal fee. If the person  fails to activate the expired brand within one year after expi-
ration of the brand, the brand is considered abandoned and  any person may apply for recordation
and use of that brand.
(4) When issuing or renewing a brand  recordation, the department shall adjust certificate expi-
ration dates as necessary to ensure that  an approximately equal number of brand [ recordation]
recordations expire in each year of a four-year cycle. The department shall prorate a brand  re-
newal fee to reflect an adjustment of a certificate expiration date.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1019 (SB 1019-B) Page 1
(5) Except as otherwise provided in this section,  the department shall establish the amount
of brand activation fees and brand renewal fees by rule.
SECTION 2.  ORS 604.066 is amended to read:
604.066. (1) Except as provided in  subsection (2) of this section, the State Department of Agri-
culture shall charge and collect a brand inspection fee in accordance with the following:
(a) $30 for a lifetime brand inspection for Equidae;
(b) $10 per head for a brand inspection for Equidae, if the brand inspection certificate  utilized
is valid for more than eight days but less than a lifetime; or
(c) $10 per head for a brand inspection on livestock other  than Equidae, if the brand inspection
certificate utilized is valid for more than eight days.
(2) In accordance with the provisions of ORS chapter 183  and except as otherwise provided
in this subsection , the department shall establish a brand inspection fee  on cattle and cattle hides
for which a brand inspection certificate is valid for eight days. The fee  shall be [ not less than $1
and not more than $1.35 ] $1.75 per head of cattle and not more than $2 per hide.
(3) Except as provided in this subsection or subsection  (4) of this section, the person requesting
or requiring brand  inspection to be performed shall pay the State Department of Agriculture a brand
inspection  fee  and the assessments authorized under ORS 577.512. Livestock auction markets,
slaughterhouses and custom slaughtering establishments at which brand inspection  is performed
shall collect the fees  and assessments and forward them to the department. The person requesting
or requiring brand inspection for cattle delivered to  a livestock auction market is not required to
pay a brand inspection fee on cattle whose value is $10 or less. The person requesting or  requiring
brand inspection is not required to pay a  brand inspection fee on cattle not more than 90 days of
age that are to be transported with their mothers to a range or pastureland outside of this state.
(4) The person requesting or requiring brand inspection is not required  to pay a brand in-
spection fee or  pay assessments when Oregon cattle are being transported from any place in this
state to any place outside of this state and then returned to this state, if the movement is continuous
without unloading enroute,  is done in the usual course of ranch operations and is not related to a
change of ownership.
(5) Except as provided in ORS 577.512, the department shall deposit all fees  paid to it under this
chapter in the State Treasury to the credit  of the Department of Agriculture Service Fund, and such
fees are continuously appropriated to the department for administering and enforcing this chapter.
The provisions of ORS 561.144 apply to such fees.
SECTION 3.
The amendments to ORS 604.027 and 604.066 by sections 1 and 2 of this  2025
Act become operative on August 1, 2025.
SECTION 4. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of ORS chapter  599 or 604, the State
Department of Agriculture may enter into  a contract with a qualified person to perform
brand inspection services on behalf of the department.
(2) Without limiting other terms of a contract described in this section, a  person per-
forming brand inspection services on behalf of the department must:
(a) Comply with  the standards, procedures and requirements established by the depart-
ment in rule, in the contract or in both rule and contract; and
(b) Pay the department fees at levels sufficient for the  department to fully recover the
costs incurred by the department for developing, administering  and enforcing a contract
described in this section.
(3) The department may adopt rules to implement this section.
SECTION 5.
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of ORS chapter  604, the State De-
partment of Agriculture may establish a self-inspection program that allows an  owner to
conduct brand inspections on the owner’s livestock, subject to the requirements of this sec-
tion.
(2) A person is eligible to participate in the self-inspection program if:
(a) The person is the sole owner of  the livestock and holds a brand registered with the
department under ORS 604.027;
Enrolled Senate Bill 1019 (SB 1019-B) Page 2
(b) The self-inspection applies only to livestock transactions  or movements involving 25
or fewer head per event within a 24-hour period; and
(c) The  owner complies with all rules adopted by the department for participation in the
program.
(3) The department  may revoke, suspend or deny self-inspection privileges if the owner
engages in gross negligence, willful misconduct or repeated violations  of this section or any
rule adopted under this section. A person whose self-inspection privileges are  revoked, sus-
pended or denied under this subsection may submit a written request for reconsideration to
the department within a period established by the department by rule.
(4) The department  shall establish fees for participation in the self-inspection program
in amounts sufficient for the department to recover  the department’s administrative,
enforcement and oversight costs.
(5) The department may adopt rules to implement this section.
SECTION 6.
(1) Sections 4 and 5 of this 2025 Act become operative on January 1, 2026.
(2) The State Department of Agriculture may  adopt rules to implement sections 4 and 5
of this 2025 Act before the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 7. (1) The Legislative Policy and Research Director  shall conduct a study on
the brand inspection program of the State Department of Agriculture  to evaluate the pro-
gram structure, funding mechanisms and effectiveness in  meeting statutory requirements.
The director shall include in the study a  comparative analysis of how other states administer
brand inspection programs.
(2) The director shall prepare a report summarizing the findings of the study. The report
shall be submitted to the interim committees of the  Legislative Assembly related to agri-
culture and natural resources no later than December 31, 2025.
SECTION 8. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate June 10, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 17, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1019 (SB 1019-B) Page 3